Connecticut, session 2026, HB05570.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027, and applicable to income and
taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2027) (a) As used in this
section, "federal pay price", "milk producer" and "minimum sustainable
monthly cost of production" have the same meanings as provided in
section 22-265b of the general statutes.
(b) Each milk producer shall be allowed a credit against the tax
imposed under chapter 208 or 229 of the general statutes, other than the
liability imposed by section 12-707 of the general statutes, in an amount
equal to, for each month of the income or taxable year the federal pay
price is below the minimum sustainable monthly cost of production, (1)
the dollar amount the federal pay price was below the minimum
sustainable monthly cost of production, (2) multiplied by the amount of
milk produced by such milk producer for such month. Each milk
producer shall file with the Commissioner of Agriculture, in a form and
manner prescribed by the commissioner, such information the
commissioner requires to substantiate the amount of milk produced by
such milk producer.
(c) (1) Any milk producer subject to the tax imposed under chapter
208 or 229 of the general statutes may apply to the Commissioner of
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5570
Agriculture, in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner, to
reserve an allocation for a credit under this section. The application shall
contain such information as the commissioner deems necessary to
administer the provisions of this section. The aggregate amount of
credits reserved under this section shall not exceed eight million dollars
in any calendar year.
(2) Upon verification by the commissioner that the conditions set
forth in subsection (b) of this section have been satisfied and the amount
of milk produced by a milk producer has been substantiated, the
commissioner shall issue a voucher to the milk producer in the amount
calculated pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. The taxpayer shall
file the voucher with the taxpayer's state tax return for the applicable
income or taxable year.
(d) If the taxpayer is an S corporation or an entity treated as a
partnership for federal income tax purposes, the credit may be claimed
by the taxpayer's shareholders or partners. If the taxpayer is a single
member limited liability company that is disregarded as an entity
separate from its owner, the credit may be claimed by such limited
liability company's owner, provided such owner is subject to the tax
imposed under chapter 208 or 229 of the general statutes.
(e) If the amount of the credit allowed pursuant to this section
exceeds the taxpayer's liability for the tax imposed under chapter 208 or
229 of the general statutes, the Commissioner of Revenue Services shall
treat such excess as an overpayment and, except as provided in section
12-739 or 12-742 of the general statutes, shall refund the amount of such
excess, without interest, to such taxpayer.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 January 1, 2027, and New section
applicable to income and
taxable years commencing
on or after January 1, 2027
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5570
FIN Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3